Louisiana, session 2026, HB839.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2212(C)(1) and 2225.2.4(A)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 38:2212(C)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2212. Advertisement and letting to lowest responsible and responsive bidder;
public work; electronic bidding; participation in mentor-protégé program;
exemptions; subpoena
* * *
C.(1) Except as provided in Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4), and (5) of this
Subsection, the term "contract limit" as used in this Section shall be equal to the sum
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars per project, including labor, materials, and
equipment as per the rates in the latest edition of the Associated Equipment Dealers
Rental Rate Book and administrative overhead not to exceed fifteen percent,
provided that beginning February 1, 2025, and annually on February first of each
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1236 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 839
subsequent year, the office of facility planning and control within the division of
administration shall adjust the "contract limit" by an amount not to exceed the annual
percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index in the preceding year. The office
of facility planning and control within the division of administration shall publish the
new contract limit for public works contracts in the Louisiana Register in January of
each year.
* * *
(5)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a hospital
service district as defined in R.S. 46:1072 may perform public work estimated to cost
one million dollars or less using its own employees without advertisement for public
bid. No project shall be artificially divided or subdivided for the purpose of avoiding
the advertisement requirements of this Section.
(b) For the purposes of this Paragraph, "using its own employees" shall mean
work performed by employees of the district and shall not include work primarily
performed by independent contractors.
(c) Nothing in this Paragraph shall be construed to authorize a hospital
service district to enter into a negotiated contract in excess of the contract limit
otherwise applicable under this Section.
* * *
§2225.2.4. Construction management at risk; public entity
A.
* * *
(3) CMAR shall not be used for any project that is estimated to cost less than
five million dollars, exclusive of a hospital service district as defined by R.S.
46:1072(2)(a) that may not use CMAR for any project estimated to cost less than two
one million dollars. At least sixty days prior to proceeding to use CMAR for any
project that is estimated to cost less than fifteen million dollars, a public entity shall
deliver written notification of the proposed CMAR project by name and description
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1236 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 839
of the project, together with the reason to use CMAR, to the House and Senate
transportation, highways, and public works committees for review and approval.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 46:1073(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1073. Market strategies and strategic planning
* * *
D. In furtherance of the purposes of this Subpart and notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, a hospital service district defined in R.S. 46:1072
may perform public work estimated to cost one million dollars or less using its own
employees without advertisement for public bid as provided in R.S. 38:2212(C)(5).